New York, session 2025-2026, S5120.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public authorities law is amended by adding two new 2 sections 1266-n and 1266-o to read as follows: 3 § 1266-n. Long Island Rail Road and Metro-North Commuter Railroad 4 Company; reimbursement. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any 5 one-way, round trip or multi-trip ticket not purchased for a specific 6 month or unlimited travel, but purchased for use on the Long Island Rail 7 Road or the Metro-North Commuter Railroad Company shall be valid for one 8 year from the date of purchase and the authority shall reimburse one 9 hundred percent of the purchase price of any unused Long Island Rail 10 Road or Metro-North Commuter Railroad Company one-way, round trip or 11 multi-trip ticket to the bearer of such ticket, provided that such tick- 12 et is returned within one year of the date of purchase. The authority is 13 prohibited from assessing any surcharge or processing fee for the return 14 of any such unused one-way, round trip or multi-trip ticket purchased 15 for use on the Long Island Rail Road or the Metro-North Commuter Rail- 16 road Company. 17 § 1266-o. Long Island Rail Road and Metro-North Commuter Railroad 18 Company; fare after boarding. Additional train fare purchased after 19 boarding by a passenger possessing a ticket with insufficient fare, 20 shall be rounded up to the nearest quarter of a dollar. 21 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 22 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06003-01-5